Maryland, session 2026, HB0258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 8–1802(a)(2) through 8–1802(a)(31) of Article – Natural Resources of the
Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 8–1802(a)(3) through
8–1802(a)(32), respectively.
– 1 –

Ch. 274 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 1. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
OF MARYLAND, That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–1802.
(a) (1) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ADJACENT” MEANS, WITH RESPECT TO AREAS WITH DIFFERENT
LAND CLASSIFICATIONS:
(I) SHARING A COMMON BOUNDARY LINE; OR
(II) SEPARATED BY A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE STREET, ROAD,
RIGHT–OF–WAY, OR OTHER UTILITY OR ACCESS EASEMENT.
8–1806.
(a) The Commission has all powers necessary for carrying out the purposes of this
subtitle, including the following:
(1) In accordance with Title 2, Subtitle 5 (Joint Committee on
Administrative, Executive and Legislative Review) and Title 10, Subtitle 1 (Administrative
Procedure Act) of the State Government Article, to adopt and amend regulations BY
AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF THE COMMISSION AND as authorized under this subtitle for the
administration and enforcement of the State and local programs;
(2) To conduct hearings in connection with policies, proposed programs,
and proposed regulations or amendments to regulations; and
(3) To contract for consultant or other services.
(b) Regulations adopted or amended under subsection (a)(1) of this section shall:
(1) Establish comprehensive standards and procedures for:
(xiv) Directives for local program development and implementation,
with respect to:
2. The [6–year] 10–YEAR comprehensive review of a local
critical area program;
8–1808.1.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 274
(c) (2) When locating new intensely developed or limited development areas,
local jurisdictions shall use the following standards:
(i) Locate a new intensely developed area in a limited development
area or [adjacent] CONTIGUOUS AND ADJOINING to an existing intensely developed area;
(ii) Locate a new limited development area [adjacent] CONTIGUOUS
AND ADJOINING to an existing limited development area or an intensely developed area;
(iii) Locate a new limited development area or an intensely developed
area in a manner that minimizes impacts to a habitat protection area as defined in COMAR
27.01.09, and in an area and manner that optimizes benefits to water quality;
(iv) Locate a new intensely developed area or a limited development
area in a resource conservation area at least 300 feet beyond the landward edge of tidal
wetlands or tidal waters, unless the local jurisdiction proposes, and the Commission
approves, alternative measures for enhancement of water quality and habitat that provide
greater benefits to the resources;
(v) Locate new intensely developed areas and limited development
areas in a manner that minimizes their impacts to the defined land uses of the resource
conservation area;
(vi) Locate new intensely developed areas and limited development
areas outside of areas vulnerable to climate change unless the local jurisdiction proposes
and the Commission approves:
1. Areas identified by the local jurisdiction as vulnerable to
climate change as required under § 8–1808(c)(1)(iii)16 of this subtitle; and
2. Measures that:
A. Assess climate resiliency and vulnerability; and
B. Incorporate siting, design, construction, and other natural
features to significantly enhance climate resiliency and reduce vulnerability;
(vii) Except as provided in item (ix) of this paragraph, no more than
one–half of the expansion allocated in the criteria of the Commission may be located in
resource conservation areas;
(viii) New intensely developed or limited development areas involving
the use of growth allocation shall conform to all criteria of the Commission and shall be
designated on the comprehensive zoning map submitted by the local jurisdiction as part of
its application to the Commission for program approval or at a later date in compliance
with § 8–1809(g) of this subtitle; and
– 3 –

Ch. 274 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ix) In Calvert, Caroline, Cecil, Charles, Dorchester, Kent, Queen
Anne’s, St. Mary’s, Somerset, Talbot, Wicomico, and Worcester counties, if the county is
unable to utilize a portion of the growth allocated to the county in items (i) and (ii) of this
paragraph within or [adjacent] CONTIGUOUS AND ADJOINING to existing intensely
developed or limited development areas as demonstrated in the local plan approved by the
Commission, then that portion of the allocated expansion which cannot be so located may
be located in the resource conservation area in addition to the expansion allocated in item
(vii) of this paragraph. A developer shall be required to cluster any development in an area
of expansion authorized under this paragraph.
8–1809.
(j) (1) As often as necessary but not more than 4 times per calendar year, each
local jurisdiction may propose program amendments and program refinements to its
adopted program.
(2) A change to a critical area designation may be granted by a local
approving authority on proof of mistake if the proposed critical area classification:
(i) Conforms to the State critical area mapping criteria;
(ii) 1. Is based on land uses or natural features in existence [as]:
A. AS of December 1, 1985, FOR THE CHESAPEAKE BAY
CRITICAL AREA; or
B. AS OF JUNE 1, 2002, FOR THE ATLANTIC COASTAL
BAYS CRITICAL AREA; OR
2. For areas included in the critical area due to remapping,
is based on land uses or natural features in existence at the time of the remapping;
(iii) Follows the local jurisdiction’s documented mapping
methodology for critical area classifications at the time of original program adoption; and
(iv) Is consistent with the purposes, policies, and goals of this subtitle
and all criteria of the Commission.
(r) (1) Proposed program refinements shall be determined as provided in this
subsection.
(2) (i) Within 30 days of the Commission’s acceptance of a proposal to
change an adopted program, the chair, on behalf of the Commission, may determine that
the proposed change is a program refinement.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 274
(ii) The chair shall notify the Commission of that determination at
the next meeting or a subsequent meeting if the local jurisdiction requests, and the chair
approves, an extension.
(iii) If a proposed change that was specifically submitted as a
program refinement is not acted on by the chair within the 30–day period UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH OR APPROVED FOR AN EXTENSION UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, the Commission shall notify the appropriate
local jurisdiction that the proposed change has been deemed to be a program amendment.
(3) (i) The Commission may vote to override the chair’s determination
only at the first Commission meeting where a quorum is present following the chair’s
notification to the Commission.
(ii) If the chair’s determination is overridden, the proposed change
is deemed a program amendment, which shall be decided by the Commission in accordance
with the procedures for program amendments provided in this section, except that the
Commission shall act on the program amendment within [90] 130 days after a vote to
override the chair.
(iii) If the chair’s determination is not overridden, within 10 working
days after the opportunity to override the chair’s decision under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, the chair shall:
1. Determine if the program refinement is consistent with
the purposes, policies, goals, and provisions of this subtitle, and all criteria of the
Commission; and
2. A. Approve the proposed program refinement and
notify the local jurisdiction;
B. Deny the program refinement;
C. Approve the proposed program refinement subject to one
or more conditions; or
D. Return the proposed program refinement back to the local
jurisdiction with a list of the changes to be made.
(iv) If the chair approves a proposed program refinement subject to
one or more conditions under subparagraph (iii)2C of this paragraph, the local jurisdiction
shall notify the Commission within 60 days of its intent to adopt the conditions.
– 5 –

Ch. 274 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) A local jurisdiction shall incorporate an approved program refinement
and any required conditions into its adopted program within 120 days of receiving notice
from the chair that the program refinement has been approved.
8–1815.1.
(b) Subject to subsection (f) of this section, if a person cuts or clears or plans to
cut or clear trees within the Chesapeake Bay Critical Area or Atlantic Coastal Bays Critical
Area in violation of an approved local critical area program or of regulations adopted by the
Commission, the chair may bring an action, or the local jurisdiction may bring an action or
request that the chair of the Commission refer the matter to the Attorney General to bring
an action:
(1) To require the person to replant trees where the cutting or clearing
occurred in accordance with a plan prepared by the State Forester, a [registered
professional] LICENSED forester, [or] a [registered] LICENSED landscape architect, OR
ANY OTHER QUALIFIED PROFESSIONAL APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(2) To restrain the planned violation; or
(3) For damages:
(i) To be assessed by a circuit court in an amount equal to the
estimated cost of replanting trees; and
(ii) To be paid to the [Department] LOCAL JURISDICTION by the
person found to have violated the provisions of this subsection.
(e) On the request of a local jurisdiction or the chair of the Commission, the State
Forester, a [registered professional] LICENSED forester, [or] a [registered] LICENSED
landscape architect, OR ANY OTHER QUALIFIED PROFESSIONAL APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT may prepare, oversee, and approve the final implementation of a plan to:
(1) Replant trees in any part of the Chesapeake Bay Critical Area where
trees in the Chesapeake Bay Critical Area are cut or cleared in violation of subsection (b)
of this section; and
(2) Replant trees in any part of the Atlantic Coastal Bays Critical Area
where trees in the Atlantic Coastal Bays Critical Area are cut or cleared in violation of
subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 6 –